Utah statutes.
4-30-4.   License required -- Application -- Fee -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  No person may operate a livestock market in this state without a license issued by the department.

(b)  Application for a license shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed and furnished by it.  The application shall specify:

(i)  if the applicant is an individual, the name, address, and date of birth of the applicant; or

(ii)  if the applicant is a partnership, corporation, or association, the name, address, and date of birth of each person who has a financial interest in the applicant and the amount of each person's interest;

(iii)  a certified statement of the financial assets and liabilities of the applicant detailing:

(A)  current assets;

(B)  current liabilities;

(C)  long-term assets; and

(D)  long-term liabilities;

(iv)  a legal description of the property where the market is proposed to be located, its street address, and a description of the facilities proposed to be used in connection with it;

(v)  a schedule of the charges or fees the applicant proposes to charge for each service rendered; and

(vi)  a detailed statement of the trade area proposed to be served by the applicant, the potential benefits which will be derived by the livestock industry, and the specific services the applicant intends to render at the livestock market.

(2) (a)  Upon receipt of a proper application, payment of a license fee in an amount determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2), and a favorable recommendation by the Livestock Market Committee, the commissioner, if satisfied that the convenience and necessity of the industry and the public will be served, shall issue a license allowing the applicant to operate the livestock market proposed in the application valid through December 31 of the year in which the license is issued, subject to suspension or revocation for cause.

(b)  A livestock market license is annually renewable on or before December 31 of each year upon the payment of an annual license renewal fee in an amount determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).

(3)  No livestock market original or renewal license may be issued until the applicant has provided the department with a certified copy of a surety bond filed with the United States Department of Agriculture as required by the Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921, 7 U.S.C.  Section 181 et seq.



Amended by Chapter 298, 1999 General Session

